Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Escapes

440.010.
Warrant for escaped or inadvertently-released convict — Reward.

If a convict escapes from a penitentiary, or is inadvertently released prior to the expiration of the sentence, the warden of that penitentiary shall issue a warrant directed to all peace officers and other persons authorizing and requiring them to capture and convey the convict to the penitentiary.

If a convict who is committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections, but is not actually confined in a facility operated by the Department of Corrections, escapes, or is inadvertently released prior to the expiration of the sentence, the commissioner of the Department of Corrections, or the commissioner’s designee, shall issue a warrant directed to all peace officers and other persons authorizing and requiring them to capture and convey the convict to the penitentiary.

Any person who captures and conveys an escaped convict back to the penitentiary shall be paid a reward of one hundred dollars ($100), and all reasonable expenses, by the state out of appropriations for that purpose. The warden may employ persons to go in pursuit of the convict, and they shall be paid a reasonable compensation for their services.

Any officer who refuses or willfully neglects to obey the warrant of the warden shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

1936; 1996, ch. 334, § 3, effective July 15, 1996.

440.020.
Confinement of captured convict.

An escaped convict, after he is reconfined, shall remain in the penitentiary until the time of his trial for the escape without an examining trial or bail. His acquittal for the offense of escape shall not affect the original sentence.

History.

1937.

440.030.
Escape of person from custody — Warrant for capture.

If any person in custody under an execution, on mesne or final process, by any order of a judge or on a charge of crime escapes, any judge, upon complaint and affidavit made of the fact, shall issue as many warrants for his capture directed to all peace officers as he deems necessary. The cause of the person’s original commitment shall be mentioned in the warrant, and it shall command all peace officers to capture the prisoner and forthwith to convey and commit him to the prison of the county from which he escaped, to be safely kept there, without bail, until discharged by due course of law. The warrant, with the proper endorsement thereon, shall be returned by the proper officer to the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the cause for which the prisoner was in custody.

History.

1600 to 1603: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 450, effective January 2, 1978.

440.040.
Liability of officer for permitting escape of prisoner in custody.

Any officer and his sureties shall be liable, in an action upon his official bond, for the use of the parties aggrieved, in any damages resulting from his voluntarily or negligently permitting the escape of a prisoner in custody. No judgment in such action shall be given unless the jury, by its verdict, finds “that the escape was with the consent of the officer, or by his negligence, or that the prisoner might have been retaken if the officer had, in good faith, made proper efforts to do so.”

History.

1604.

440.050.
Liability for aiding escape of prisoner.

Any person who aids a prisoner to escape, or knowingly conceals him after he escapes, or in any way hinders or prevents his capture shall be liable to the party aggrieved for any damages sustained.

History.

1605.